Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,274
Recreation camps; suspension of operation by local government; grounds.

Operation of a recreation camp may be temporarily suspended by the local government which exercises jurisdiction over such recreation camp for failure to protect the health and safety of the occupants of the camp or failure to comply with the minimum health and safety requirements established by such local government.

Laws 1959, c. 328, § 4, p. 1194;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 643;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 558;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 71-3104;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 14;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 32.
July 18, 2026